Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.110

Tuition and fees when joint program of four year institutions—Supplemental fees, when.

Where students at any of the four year state colleges or universities participate in a joint program undertaken by two or more of such institutions, and which leads to a degree, the tuition and fees assessed each student participating in such joint program shall be equal.

The governing board at each state four year institution shall, where the tuition and fees which it charges resident students participating in a joint program falling within the scope of this section would be less than those charged to any such students from any other state four year institution who participates in such joint program, impose a supplemental fee upon its resident students so participating in order to make the tuition and fees charged to them equal to the highest amount charged to any other resident student from a state four year institution who participates in the program. Such governing board shall, where the tuition and fees which it charges nonresident students participating in a joint program falling within the scope of this section would be less than those charged to any such students participating from any other state four year institution who participates in such joint program, impose a supplemental fee upon its nonresident students so participating in order to make the tuition and fees charged to them equal to the highest amount charged to any other nonresident student from a state four year institution who participates in the program.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 126 s 1.]

NOTES:

"State universities," "regional universities," "state college," "institutions of higher education," and "postsecondary institutions" defined: RCW 28B.10.016.